Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1802
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Public Entities Mandated Project Charges Act, the definitions found in sections 70-1803 to 70-1811 apply.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB141, § 2.